Louisiana, session 2026, SB111.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 56:325(A)(13) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§325. Daily take, possession, and size limits; freshwater recreational fish; possession
of finfish filets prohibited
A. No person shall take in any one day more than the following of each
species of fish, of the designated size where specified:
* * *
(13) Within the area south of US 190 from the West Atchafalaya Basin
Protection Levee to the intersection of LA 1 and US 190 due north of Port Allen,
east of the West Atchafalaya Basin Protection Levee from US 190 to US 90,
north of US 90 from the West Atchafalaya Basin Protection Levee to LA 20,
north and west of LA 20 from US 90 to LA 1 in Thibodaux, south and west of
LA 1 from LA 20 to US 190, no person shall take, in any one day, more than the
following of the designated size:
(a) Black bass (Micropterus spp.), or their hybrids - minimum size twelve
inches total length - five.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 111 ENROLLED
(b) Crappie (Pomoxis spp.), or their hybrids, also locally called white
perch or sac-a-lait - minimum size eight inches total length - twenty-five.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.